Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.351

Electronic access to public records—Findings—Intent.

Based upon the recommendations of the public information access policy task force, the legislature finds that government records and information are a vital resource to both government operations and to the public that government serves. Broad public access to state and local government records and information has potential for expanding citizen access to that information and for improving government services. Electronic methods for locating and transferring information can improve linkages between and among citizens, organizations, businesses, and governments. Information must be managed with great care to meet the objectives of citizens and their governments.

It is the intent of the legislature to encourage state and local governments to develop, store, and manage their public records and information in electronic formats to meet their missions and objectives. Further, it is the intent of the legislature for state and local governments to set priorities for making public records widely available electronically to the public.

[ 1996 c 171 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.41A.115, 43.105.250.]